Utah statutes.
72-10-201.   Powers of division -- Acceptance of property.

The division, a county, or municipal legislative body may accept contributions of money or real or personal property for the purpose of establishing, developing, operating, or maintaining airports under this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

